Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-5667
Agreements under prior law; renegotiation.

Agreements executed prior to July 1, 2007, under the Rural Health Systems and Professional Incentive Act may be renegotiated and new agreements executed to reflect the terms required by section 71-5666. No funds repaid by borrowers under the terms of agreements executed prior to July 1, 2007, shall be refunded. Any repayments being made under the terms of prior agreements may be discontinued upon execution of a new agreement if conditions permit. Any agreement renegotiated pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the requirements of the State Procurement Act.

Laws 1991, LB 400, § 18;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 55;

Laws 2007, LB374, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB196, § 2;

Laws 2012, LB858, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB196, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB461, § 27.

State Procurement Act, see section 73-801.